Virginia statutes. Title 37.2. Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.
Article 5. Involuntary Admissions.
§ 37.2-817.
(Effective until October 1, 2022) Involuntary admission and mandatory outpatient treatment orders.

The district court judge or special justice shall render a decision on the petition for involuntary admission after the appointed examiner has presented the report required by §

37.2-815

, and after the community services board that serves the county or city where the person resides or, if impractical, where the person is located has presented a preadmission screening report with recommendations for that person’s placement, care, and treatment pursuant to §

37.2-816

. These reports, if not contested, may constitute sufficient evidence upon which the district court judge or special justice may base his decision. The examiner, if not physically present at the hearing, and the treating physician at the facility of temporary detention shall be available whenever possible for questioning during the hearing through a two-way electronic video and audio or telephonic communication system as authorized in §

37.2-804.1

.

Any employee or designee of the local community services board, as defined in §

37.2-809

, representing the community services board that prepared the preadmission screening report shall attend the hearing in person or, if physical attendance is not practicable, shall participate in the hearing through a two-way electronic video and audio or telephonic communication system as authorized in §

37.2-804.1

. Where a hearing is held outside of the service area of the community services board that prepared the preadmission screening report, and it is not practicable for a representative of the community services board that prepared the preadmission screening report to attend or participate in the hearing, arrangements shall be made by the community services board that prepared the preadmission screening report for an employee or designee of the community services board serving the area in which the hearing is held to attend or participate on behalf of the community services board that prepared the preadmission screening report. The employee or designee of the local community services board, as defined in §

37.2-809

, representing the community services board that prepared the preadmission screening report or attending or participating on behalf of the community services board that prepared the preadmission screening report shall not be excluded from the hearing pursuant to an order of sequestration of witnesses. The community services board that prepared the preadmission screening report shall remain responsible for the person subject to the hearing and, prior to the hearing, shall send the preadmission screening report through certified mail, personal delivery, facsimile with return receipt acknowledged, or other electronic means with documented acknowledgment of receipt to the community services board attending the hearing. Where a community services board attends the hearing on behalf of the community services board that prepared the preadmission screening report, the attending community services board shall inform the community services board that prepared the preadmission screening report of the disposition of the matter upon the conclusion of the hearing. In addition, the attending community services board shall transmit the disposition through certified mail, personal delivery, facsimile with return receipt acknowledged, or other electronic means with documented acknowledgment of receipt.At least 12 hours prior to the hearing, the court shall provide to the community services board that prepared the preadmission screening report the time and location of the hearing. If the representative of the community services board that prepared the preadmission screening report will be present by telephonic means, the court shall provide the telephone number to the community services board. If a representative of a community services board will be attending the hearing on behalf of the community services board that prepared the preadmission screening report, the community services board that prepared the preadmission screening report shall promptly communicate the time and location of the hearing and, if the representative of the community services board attending on behalf of the community services board that prepared the preadmission screening report will be present by telephonic means, the telephone number to the attending community services board.

After observing the person and considering (i) the recommendations of any treating or examining physician or psychologist licensed in Virginia, if available, (ii) any past actions of the person, (iii) any past mental health treatment of the person, (iv) any examiner’s certification, (v) any health records available, (vi) the preadmission screening report, and (vii) any other relevant evidence that may have been admitted, including whether the person recently has been found unrestorably incompetent to stand trial after a hearing held pursuant to subsection E of §

19.2-169.1

, if the judge or special justice finds by clear and convincing evidence that (a) the person has a mental illness and there is a substantial likelihood that, as a result of mental illness, the person will, in the near future, (1) cause serious physical harm to himself or others as evidenced by recent behavior causing, attempting, or threatening harm and other relevant information, if any, or (2) suffer serious harm due to his lack of capacity to protect himself from harm or to provide for his basic human needs, and (b) all available less restrictive treatment alternatives to involuntary inpatient treatment, pursuant to subsection D, that would offer an opportunity for the improvement of the person’s condition have been investigated and determined to be inappropriate, the judge or special justice shall by written order and specific findings so certify and order that the person be admitted involuntarily to a facility for a period of treatment not to exceed 30 days from the date of the court order. Such involuntary admission shall be to a facility designated by the community services board that serves the county or city in which the person was examined as provided in §

37.2-816

. If the community services board does not designate a facility at the commitment hearing, the person shall be involuntarily admitted to a facility designated by the Commissioner. Upon the expiration of an order for involuntary admission, the person shall be released unless (A) he is involuntarily admitted by further petition and order of a court, which shall be for a period not to exceed 180 days from the date of the subsequent court order, (B) he makes application for treatment on a voluntary basis as provided for in §

37.2-805

, or (C) he is ordered to mandatory outpatient treatment following a period of inpatient treatment. At any time prior to the discharge of a person who has been involuntarily admitted pursuant to this subsection, the person, the person’s treating physician, a family member or personal representative of the person, or the community services board serving the county or city where the facility is located, the county or city where the person resides, or the county or city where the person will receive treatment following discharge may file a motion with the court for a hearing to determine whether such person should be ordered to mandatory outpatient treatment following a period of inpatient treatment pursuant to subsection C1 or D upon discharge if such person, on at least two previous occasions within 36 months preceding the date of the hearing, has been (I) involuntarily admitted pursuant to this section or (II) the subject of a temporary detention order and voluntarily admitted himself in accordance with subsection B of §

37.2-814

, except that such 36-month period shall not include any time during which the person was receiving inpatient psychiatric treatment or was incarcerated, as established by evidence admitted at the hearing. A district court judge or special justice shall hold the hearing within 72 hours after receiving the motion for a hearing to determine whether the person should be ordered to mandatory outpatient treatment following a period of involuntary inpatient treatment; however, if the 72-hour period expires on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the hearing shall be held by the close of business on the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday. The district court judge or special justice may enter an order for a period of mandatory outpatient treatment following a period of involuntary inpatient treatment upon finding that the person meets the criteria set forth in subsection C1.

After observing the person and considering (i) the recommendations of any treating or examining physician or psychologist licensed in Virginia, if available, (ii) any past actions of the person, (iii) any past mental health treatment of the person, (iv) any examiner’s certification, (v) any health records available, (vi) the preadmission screening report, and (vii) any other relevant evidence that may have been admitted, if the judge or special justice finds by clear and convincing evidence that (a) the person has a mental illness and that there exists a substantial likelihood that, as a result of mental illness, the person will, in the near future, (1) cause serious physical harm to himself or others as evidenced by recent behavior causing, attempting, or threatening harm and other relevant information, if any, or (2) suffer serious harm due to his lack of capacity to protect himself from harm or to provide for his basic human needs; (b) less restrictive alternatives to involuntary inpatient treatment that would offer an opportunity for improvement of his condition have been investigated and are determined to be appropriate, as reflected in the initial outpatient treatment plan prepared in accordance with subsection F; (c) the person has the ability to adhere to the mandatory outpatient treatment plan; and (d) the ordered treatment will be delivered on an outpatient basis by the community services board or designated provider to the person, the judge or special justice shall by written order and specific findings so certify and order that the person be admitted involuntarily to mandatory outpatient treatment. Less restrictive alternatives shall not be determined to be appropriate unless the services are actually available in the community. The duration of mandatory outpatient treatment shall be determined by the court based on recommendations of the community services board but shall not exceed 180 days; in prescribing the terms of the order, including its length, the judge or special justice shall consider the impact on the person’s opportunities and obligations, including education and employment. Upon expiration of an order for mandatory outpatient treatment, the person shall be released from the requirements of the order unless the order is continued in accordance with §

37.2-817.4

.

Mandatory outpatient treatment may include day treatment in a hospital, night treatment in a hospital, outpatient involuntary treatment with anti-psychotic medication pursuant to Chapter 11 (§

37.2-1100

et seq.), or other appropriate course of treatment as may be necessary to meet the needs of the person. Mandatory outpatient treatment shall not include the use of restraints or physical force of any kind in the provision of the medication. The community services board that serves the county or city in which the person resides shall recommend a specific course of treatment and programs for the provision of mandatory outpatient treatment.

Any order for mandatory outpatient treatment entered pursuant to subsection D shall include an initial mandatory outpatient treatment plan developed by the community services board that completed the preadmission screening report. The plan shall, at a minimum, (i) identify the specific services to be provided, (ii) identify the provider who has agreed to provide each service, (iii) describe the arrangements made for the initial in-person appointment or contact with each service provider, and (iv) include any other relevant information that may be available regarding the mandatory outpatient treatment ordered. The order shall require the community services board to monitor the implementation of the mandatory outpatient treatment plan and the person’s progress and adherence to the initial mandatory outpatient treatment plan.

Prior to discharging a person to mandatory outpatient treatment in accordance with an order for mandatory outpatient treatment following a period of involuntary inpatient treatment entered pursuant to subsection C1 or no later than five days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, or legal holidays, after an order for mandatory outpatient treatment has been entered pursuant to subsection D, the community services board where the person resides that is responsible for monitoring the person’s progress and adherence to the comprehensive mandatory outpatient treatment plan shall file a comprehensive mandatory outpatient treatment plan. The comprehensive mandatory outpatient treatment plan shall (i) identify the specific type, amount, duration, and frequency of each service to be provided to the person; (ii) identify the provider that has agreed to provide each service included in the plan; (iii) certify that the services are the most appropriate and least restrictive treatment available for the person; (iv) certify that each provider has complied and continues to comply with applicable provisions of the Department’s licensing regulations; (v) be developed with the fullest possible involvement and participation of the person and his family, with the person’s consent, and reflect his preferences to the greatest extent possible to support his recovery and self-determination, including incorporating any preexisting crisis plan or advance directive of the person; (vi) specify the particular conditions to which the person shall be required to adhere; and (vii) describe (a) how the community services board shall monitor the person’s progress and adherence to the plan and (b) any conditions, including scheduled meetings or continued adherence to medication, necessary for mandatory outpatient treatment to be appropriate for the person. The community services board shall submit the comprehensive mandatory outpatient treatment plan to the court for approval. Upon approval by the court, the comprehensive mandatory outpatient treatment plan shall be filed with the court and incorporated into the order of mandatory outpatient treatment entered pursuant to subsection C1 or D, as appropriate. A copy of the comprehensive mandatory outpatient treatment plan shall be provided to the person by the community services board upon approval of the comprehensive mandatory outpatient treatment plan by the court.

If the community services board responsible for developing a comprehensive mandatory outpatient treatment plan pursuant to subsection C1 or D determines that the services necessary for the treatment of the person’s mental illness are not available or cannot be provided to the person in accordance with the order for mandatory outpatient treatment, it shall petition the court for rescission of the mandatory outpatient treatment order or order for mandatory outpatient treatment following a period of involuntary inpatient treatment in accordance with the provisions of §

37.2-817.2

.

Upon entry of any order for mandatory outpatient treatment following a period of involuntary inpatient treatment pursuant to subsection C1 or mandatory outpatient treatment entered pursuant to subsection D, the clerk of the court shall provide a copy of the order to the person who is the subject of the order, to his attorney, and to the community services board required to monitor the person’s progress and adherence to the comprehensive mandatory outpatient treatment plan. The community services board shall acknowledge receipt of the order to the clerk of the court on a form established by the Office of the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court and provided by the court for this purpose within five business days.

The court may transfer jurisdiction of the case to the district court where the person resides at any time after the entry of the mandatory outpatient treatment order. The community services board responsible for monitoring the person’s progress and adherence to the comprehensive mandatory outpatient treatment plan shall remain responsible for monitoring the person’s progress and adherence to the plan until the community services board serving the locality to which jurisdiction of the case has been transferred acknowledges the transfer and receipt of the order to the clerk of the court on a form established by the Office of the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court and provided by the court for this purpose. The community services board serving the locality to which jurisdiction of the case has been transferred shall acknowledge the transfer and receipt of the order within five business days.

Any order entered pursuant to this section shall provide for the disclosure of medical records pursuant to §

37.2-804.2

. This subsection shall not preclude any other disclosures as required or permitted by law.

C1.

In an order for involuntary admission pursuant to subsection C, the judge or special justice may also order that, upon discharge from inpatient treatment, the person adhere to a comprehensive mandatory outpatient treatment plan, if the judge or special justice further finds by clear and convincing evidence that (i) the person has a history of lack of adherence to treatment for mental illness that has, at least twice within the past 36 months, resulted in the person being subject to an order for involuntary admission pursuant to subsection C or being subject to a temporary detention order and then voluntarily admitting himself in accordance with subsection B of §

37.2-814

, except that such 36-month period shall not include any time during which the person was receiving inpatient psychiatric treatment or was incarcerated, as established by evidence admitted at the hearing; (ii) in view of the person’s treatment history and current behavior, the person is in need of mandatory outpatient treatment following inpatient treatment in order to prevent a relapse or deterioration that would be likely to result in the person meeting the criteria for involuntary inpatient treatment; (iii) the person has the ability to adhere to the comprehensive mandatory outpatient treatment plan; and (iv) the person is likely to benefit from mandatory outpatient treatment. The duration of the period of inpatient treatment shall be determined by the court and the maximum period of inpatient treatment shall not exceed 30 days. The duration of mandatory outpatient treatment shall be determined by the court based on recommendations of the community services board and the maximum period of mandatory outpatient treatment shall not exceed 180 days; in prescribing the terms of the order, including its length, the judge or special justice shall consider the impact on the person’s opportunities and obligations, including education and employment. The period of mandatory outpatient treatment shall begin upon discharge of the person from involuntary inpatient treatment, either upon expiration of the 30-day period or pursuant to §

37.2-837

or

37.2-838

. The treating physician and facility staff shall develop the comprehensive mandatory outpatient treatment plan in conjunction with the community services board and the person. The comprehensive mandatory outpatient treatment plan shall include all of the components described in, and shall be filed with the court and incorporated into, the order for mandatory outpatient treatment following a period of involuntary inpatient treatment in accordance with subsection G. The community services board where the person resides upon discharge shall monitor the person’s progress and adherence to the comprehensive mandatory outpatient treatment plan. Upon expiration of the order for mandatory outpatient treatment following a period of involuntary inpatient treatment, the person shall be released unless the order is continued in accordance with §

37.2-817.4

.

History.

1976, c. 671, § 37.1-67.3; 1979, c. 426; 1980, cc. 166, 582; 1982, c. 471; 1984, c. 277; 1985, c. 261; 1986, cc. 349, 609; 1988, c. 225; 1989, c. 716; 1990, cc. 59, 60, 728, 798; 1991, c. 636; 1992, c. 752; 1994, cc. 736, 907; 1995, cc. 489, 668, 844; 1996, cc. 343, 893; 1997, cc. 558, 921; 1998, c. 446; 2001, cc. 478, 479, 507, 658, 837; 2004, cc. 66, 1014; 2005, cc. 458, 716; 2008, cc. 779, 780, 782, 793, 850, 870; 2009, cc. 21, 838; 2010, cc. 330, 461; 2012, cc. 300, 451, 501; 2013, c. 179; 2014, cc. 499, 538; 2016, c. 688.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective October 1, 2022. For the version of this section effective until October 1, 2022, see the preceding section, also numbered
§

37.2-817

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 458, amended former § 37.1-67.3, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2005, c. 716, cl. 5, the 2005 amendment by c. 458 has been given effect in this section as set out above by substituting “by clear and convincing evidence” for “specifically” in the first sentence of subsections B and C.

Acts 2021, Special Session I, c. 221, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2022, c. 763, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2022.”

Acts
2022, c. 763, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2022.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 779, in subsections B and C, rewrote clause (i) which read: “the person presents an imminent danger to himself or others as a result of mental illness or has been proven to be so seriously mentally ill as to be substantially unable to care for himself.”

The 2008 amendment by c. 780 added subsection B and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; deleted “or behavioral health authority” following “the community services board” throughout the section; in subsection A, substituted “presented the report required by §

37.2-815

, and after the community services board” for “presented his report, orally or in writing, pursuant to §

37.2-815

, and after the community services board or behavioral health authority” and deleted “orally or in writing” following “screening report” in the first sentence and added the last sentence; in subsection C, deleted “and obtaining the necessary positive certification” following “observing the person,” substituted the present provisions of clause (ii) for “alternatives to involuntary inpatient treatment have been investigated and deemed unsuitable and there is no less restrictive alternative to involuntary inpatient treatment, the judge or special justice shall by written order and specific findings so certify and order that the person be admitted involuntarily to a facility for a period of treatment not to exceed 180 days from the date of the court order,” and rewrote the last sentence; in subsection D, deleted “obtaining the necessary positive certification and” following “observing the person and” and in clause (ii), inserted “that would offer an opportunity for improvement of the person’s condition” near the beginning and substituted “are determined to be appropriate, and (iii)” for “are deemed suitable, (iii)” at the end; in clause (iii), substituted “has sufficient capacity to” for “has the degree of competency necessary to” at the beginning of sub-clause (a), in sub-clause (b), substituted “has expressed” for “expresses” at the beginning and substituted “has agreed” for “agrees” near the middle, and inserted “and understand and adhere to conditions and requirements of the treatment and services” in sub-clause (c); and rewrote clause (iv); and in subsection E, inserted “Mandatory” at the beginning of the paragraph; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2008 amendment by c. 782 added subsection D [now subsection K].

The 2008 amendment by c. 793 substituted clauses (i) through (vii) for “any other relevant evidence that may have been offered” and redesignated remaining subclauses accordingly, in
subsections B and C.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 850 and 870 are identical, and added subsection B and subsections F through K and rewrote the section to incorporate amendments by other 2008 acts.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by c. 21, effective February 23, 2009, and c. 838, effective April 8, 2009, are identical and in subsection B, in the first sentence, substituted “Any employee or designee” for “An employee or a designee” and inserted “representing the community services board” and added the present third sentence.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 330 and 461 are identical, and added subsections C1 and C2; inserted “entered pursuant to subsection D” in the first sentence of subsection F; in subsection G, substituted “subsection D” for “this section” in the first sentence, inserted “and his family, with the person’s consent” in clause (v) of the second sentence; inserted “entered pursuant to subsection D” in the first sentence of subsection I; and inserted “or discharge plan” in the second sentence of subsection J.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 300 added the last two sentences in subsection C; and deleted “of this section” following “subsection C1” in the first sentence of subsection C2.

The 2012 amendment by c. 451 inserted “including whether the person recently has been found unrestorably incompetent to stand trial after a hearing held pursuant to subsection E of §

19.2-169.1

” following clause (vii) in subsection C; and deleted “of this section” following “subsection C1” in the first sentence of subsection C2.

The 2012 amendment by c. 501, in subsection C1, deleted “not to exceed the length of such order” following “mandatory outpatient treatment” near the beginning in the first sentence and added the last sentence; in subsection C2, in the first sentence, deleted “of this section” following “subsection C1,” redesignated former clause (1) as clause (i), and substituted “and (c) has agreed to abide by his discharge plan and has the ability to do so; and (ii) the ordered treatment will” for “(c) has sufficient capacity to understand the stipulations of his treatment, (d) has expressed an interest in living in the community and has agreed to abide by his discharge plan, (e) is deemed to have the capacity to comply with the discharge plan and understand and adhere to conditions and requirements of the treatment and services and (f) the ordered treatment can” and “designated provider to the person” for “designated provider; and (2) at the time of discharge, services are actually available in the community and providers of services have actually agreed to deliver the services”; in subsection D, substituted “(c) the person has agreed to abide by his treatment plan and has the ability to do so; and (d) the ordered treatment will be delivered” for “and (c) the person (A) has sufficient capacity to understand the stipulations of his treatment, (B) has expressed an interest in living in the community and has agreed to abide by his treatment plan, and (C) is deemed to have the capacity to comply with the treatment plan and understand and adhere to conditions and requirements of the treatment and services; and (d) the ordered treatment can be delivered,” inserted “to the person” following “designated provider” and deleted “and providers of the services have actually agreed to deliver the services” from the end; and inserted the present second sentence in subsection E.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 179, in subsection C, substituted “county or city” for “city or county” in the second sentence and in the next-to-last sentence, substituted “serving the county or city” for “serving the area” and inserted “the county or city where the person resides, or the county or city where the person receives treatment” following “facility is located”; and substituted “county or city” for “city or county” in the third sentence of subsection E.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 499 and 538 are identical and, in subsection I, inserted “within five business days”; and in subsection J added the last sentence.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 688 inserted the second sentence in subsection C2.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 221, effective July 1, 2022, rewrote the section.

Law Review.

For note, “Law and Morality ‘Unspeakable Justice’: The Oswaldo Martinez Case and the Failure of the Legal System to Adequately Provide for Incompetent Defendants,” see 48 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 2075 (2007).

§ 37.2-817.
(Effective October 1, 2022) Involuntary admission.

The district court judge or special justice shall render a decision on the petition for involuntary admission after the appointed examiner has presented the report required by §

37.2-815

, and after the community services board that serves the county or city where the person resides or, if impractical, where the person is located has presented a preadmission screening report with recommendations for that person’s placement, care, and treatment pursuant to §

37.2-816

. These reports, if not contested, may constitute sufficient evidence upon which the district court judge or special justice may base his decision. The examiner, if not physically present at the hearing, and the treating physician at the facility of temporary detention shall be available whenever possible for questioning during the hearing through a two-way electronic video and audio or telephonic communication system as authorized in §

37.2-804.1

.

Any employee or designee of the local community services board, as defined in §

37.2-809

, representing the community services board that prepared the preadmission screening report shall attend the hearing in person or, if physical attendance is not practicable, shall participate in the hearing through a two-way electronic video and audio or telephonic communication system as authorized in §

37.2-804.1

. Where a hearing is held outside of the service area of the community services board that prepared the preadmission screening report, and it is not practicable for a representative of the community services board that prepared the preadmission screening report to attend or participate in the hearing, arrangements shall be made by the community services board that prepared the preadmission screening report for an employee or designee of the community services board serving the area in which the hearing is held to attend or participate on behalf of the community services board that prepared the preadmission screening report. The employee or designee of the local community services board, as defined in §

37.2-809

, representing the community services board that prepared the preadmission screening report or attending or participating on behalf of the community services board that prepared the preadmission screening report shall not be excluded from the hearing pursuant to an order of sequestration of witnesses. The community services board that prepared the preadmission screening report shall remain responsible for the person subject to the hearing and, prior to the hearing, shall send the preadmission screening report through certified mail, personal delivery, facsimile with return receipt acknowledged, or other electronic means with documented acknowledgment of receipt to the community services board attending the hearing. Where a community services board attends the hearing on behalf of the community services board that prepared the preadmission screening report, the attending community services board shall inform the community services board that prepared the preadmission screening report of the disposition of the matter upon the conclusion of the hearing. In addition, the attending community services board shall transmit the disposition through certified mail, personal delivery, facsimile with return receipt acknowledged, or other electronic means with documented acknowledgment of receipt.

At least 12 hours prior to the hearing, the court shall provide to the community services board that prepared the preadmission screening report the time and location of the hearing. If the representative of the community services board that prepared the preadmission screening report will be present by telephonic means, the court shall provide the telephone number to the community services board. If a representative of a community services board will be attending the hearing on behalf of the community services board that prepared the preadmission screening report, the community services board that prepared the preadmission screening report shall promptly communicate the time and location of the hearing and, if the representative of the community services board attending on behalf of the community services board that prepared the preadmission screening report will be present by telephonic means, the telephone number to the attending community services board.

After observing the person and considering (i) the recommendations of any treating or examining physician or psychologist licensed in Virginia, if available, (ii) any past actions of the person, (iii) any past mental health treatment of the person, (iv) any examiner’s certification, (v) any health records available, (vi) the preadmission screening report, and (vii) any other relevant evidence that may have been admitted, including whether the person recently has been found unrestorably incompetent to stand trial after a hearing held pursuant to subsection E of §

19.2-169.1

, if the judge or special justice finds by clear and convincing evidence that (a) the person has a mental illness and there is a substantial likelihood that, as a result of mental illness, the person will, in the near future, (1) cause serious physical harm to himself or others as evidenced by recent behavior causing, attempting, or threatening harm and other relevant information, if any, or (2) suffer serious harm due to his lack of capacity to protect himself from harm or to provide for his basic human needs, and (b) all available less restrictive treatment alternatives to involuntary inpatient treatment that would offer an opportunity for the improvement of the person’s condition have been investigated and determined to be inappropriate, the judge or special justice shall by written order and specific findings so certify and order that the person be admitted involuntarily to a facility for a period of treatment not to exceed 30 days from the date of the court order. Such involuntary admission shall be to a facility designated by the community services board that serves the county or city in which the person was examined as provided in §

37.2-816

. If the community services board does not designate a facility at the commitment hearing, the person shall be involuntarily admitted to a facility designated by the Commissioner. Upon the expiration of an order for involuntary admission, the person shall be released unless (A) he is involuntarily admitted by further petition and order of a court, which shall be for a period not to exceed 180 days from the date of the subsequent court order, (B) he makes application for treatment on a voluntary basis as provided for in §

37.2-805

, or (C) he is ordered to mandatory outpatient treatment following a period of inpatient treatment pursuant to §

37.2-817.01

.

History.

1976, c. 671, § 37.1-67.3; 1979, c. 426; 1980, cc. 166, 582; 1982, c. 471; 1984, c. 277; 1985, c. 261; 1986, cc. 349, 609; 1988, c. 225; 1989, c. 716; 1990, cc. 59, 60, 728, 798; 1991, c. 636; 1992, c. 752; 1994, cc. 736, 907; 1995, cc. 489, 668, 844; 1996, cc. 343, 893; 1997, cc. 558, 921; 1998, c. 446; 2001, cc. 478, 479, 507, 658, 837; 2004, cc. 66, 1014; 2005, cc. 458, 716; 2008, cc. 779, 780, 782, 793, 850, 870; 2009, cc. 21, 838; 2010, cc. 330, 461; 2012, cc. 300, 451, 501; 2013, c. 179; 2014, cc. 499, 538; 2016, c. 688; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 221; 2022, c. 763.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 763, effective October 1, 2022, in clause (C) of subsection C, added “pursuant to §

37.2-817.01

.” and deleted the fifth through seventh sentences, which read: “At any time prior to the discharge of a person who has been involuntarily admitted pursuant to this subsection, the person, the person's treating physician, a family member or personal representative of the person, or the community services board serving the county or city where the facility is located, the county or city where the person resides, or the county or city where the person will receive treatment following discharge may file a motion with the court for a hearing to determine whether such person should be ordered to mandatory outpatient treatment following a period of inpatient treatment pursuant to subsection C1 or D upon discharge if such person, on at least two previous occasions within 36 months preceding the date of the hearing, has been (I) involuntarily admitted pursuant to this section or (II) the subject of a temporary detention order and voluntarily admitted himself in accordance with subsection B of §

37.2-814

, except that such 36-month period shall not include any time during which the person was receiving inpatient psychiatric treatment or was incarcerated, as established by evidence admitted at the hearing. A district court judge or special justice shall hold the hearing within 72 hours after receiving the motion for a hearing to determine whether the person should be ordered to mandatory outpatient treatment following a period of involuntary inpatient treatment; however, if the 72-hour period expires on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the hearing shall be held by the close of business on the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday. The district court judge or special justice may enter an order for a period of mandatory outpatient treatment following a period of involuntary inpatient treatment upon finding that the person meets the criteria set forth in subsection C1.”; and deleted subdivision C1 and subsections D through K, which dealt with inpatient and outpatient treatments.